apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON NUMORD_КУДО
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>це WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<coll%>%<attr%>@P.TLOSS.ON@:ценст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<der_mwn%>:%>це N_КУДО ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>тькс WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<der_mwn%>:%>тькс N_ОШ ;

!!
LEXICON AssocColl-kavone
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<coll_assoc%>: PossPX1 ;
%<use_sub%>%<qnt%>%<num%>%<coll_assoc%>%<pxpl1%>:к WORD-END ; ! 2012-10-28

!!кавто-колмо
LEXICON NUMAPPROX_
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<appr%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON Card-2
 Cards-1-2 ;
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<cx_lat%>:%>в K ;
!!
LEXICON Cards-1-2
%<qnt%>%<num%>: WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<appr%>:%>шка WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;


LEXICON Assoc-Coll
%<qnt%>%<coll_assoc%>: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-PossX ;

LEXICON ITER__SUB
%<use_sub%>: ITER_ ;

LEXICON ITER_
%<qnt%>%<iter%>: K ;
!! once, twice; весть, кавксть, аламоксть

LEXICON ITER-INDEF
%<qnt%>%<iter%>%<indef%>: K ;

LEXICON ORD_
%<qnt%>%<ord%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-ORD
%<qnt%>%<ord%>%<adv%>: K ;
!! васняяк 'first of all'

LEXICON QNT_
%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON QNT_КУДО
%<qnt%>: K ;

LEXICON QNT_ЛАМО
 QNT_КУДО ;

LEXICON QNT_КУДО
%<qnt%>: K ;
%<qnt%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;
%<qnt%>: DER/PR4_OBL-SC3 ; ! ламольть

LEXICON QNT-ADN
%<qnt%>%<dep%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON QNT-DISTR
%<qnt%>%<distr%>: K ;

LEXICON QNT-INDEF
%<qnt%>%<indef%>: K ;

LEXICON QNT_ВЕСЕМЕ
%<qnt%>%<dep%>: WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<pron%>@P.POS.PRON@:00@P.POS.PRON@ _КУДО-Indef-Declension-SG ;

%<qnt%>%<pron%>@P.POS.PRON@:00@P.POS.PRON@ NMN_DEF-SG-DECLENSION ;

%<qnt%>%<pron%>@P.POS.PRON@:00@P.POS.PRON@ SG-NOM-PX ;
%<qnt%>%<pron%>@P.POS.PRON@:00@P.POS.PRON@ SG-GEN-PX ;

%<qnt%>%<pron%>%<sg%>%<cx_abl%>%<pxpl2%>:%>дО1%>нк K ;
%<qnt%>%<pron%>%<sg%>%<cx_abl%>%<pxpl3%>:%>дО1%>ст K ;
%<qnt%>%<pron%>%<sg%>%<cx_ela%>%<pxpl3%>:%>стО1%>ст K ;


LEXICON _КУДО-NUM
%<qnt%>%<num%>: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
%<qnt%>%<num%>: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
%<qnt%>%<num%>: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON sjado-NUM-PL
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<der_mwn%>:%> NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<der_mwn%>:%>О1 NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<der_mwn%>: _ПАНГО-Indef-Declension ;
%<qnt%>%<num%>%<der_mwn%>: N_ПАНГО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;


LEXICON Cards-kal
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>це Quants3 ;
 Quants2 ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>: WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON CARDS_ОШ
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>О1це Quants3 ;
 Quants2 ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>: WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ОШ ;


LEXICON CARDS_КУДО
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>це Quants3 ;
 Quants2 ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>: WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;


! 2012-08-09
!LEXICON Quants1
! Quants2 ;
! %<ord%>:%>це Quants3 ;
! %<ord%>:%>О1це Quants3 ;

LEXICON Quants2
 Quants3 ;
%<coll%>%<attr%>@P.TLOSS.ON@:нст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
%<coll_assoc%>@P.KLOSS.ON@:нек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
%<appr%>%<coll_assoc%>@P.KLOSS.ON@:шканек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
%<coll_assoc%>:%>не _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
%<appr%>%<coll_assoc%>:%>шкане _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
%<coll_assoc%>:%>не _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;
%<iter%>:%>ксть Ks ;
%<iter%>:%>%^О2ксть Ks ;
%<appr%>%<iter%>:%>шкаксть Ks ;
%<appr%>%<iter%>:%>%^О2шкаксть Ks ;

LEXICON Adverbs
васня:васня ORD_  "" ;
окойники:окойники ORD_  "" ;
LEXICON Quantifiers
колмоненек:колмоненек QNT_  "XX" ;
аламнэшка:аламнэшка QNT_КУДО  "XX" ;
кавто-колмо:кавто-колмо NUMAPPROX_  "pari kolme" ;
кеменьксть:кеменьксть ITER-INDEF  "" ;
кавто:кавто Card-2  "" ;
аламнэнзэ:аламнэ Assoc-Coll  "" ;
аламо:аламо QNT_ЛАМО  "" ;
аламонь-аламонь:аламонь-аламонь QNT_ЛАМО  "vähitellen" ;
аламошка:аламошка QNT_ЛАМО  "" ;
аламонест:аламоне Assoc-Coll  "" ;
аламос:аламос QNT_  "" ;
байтяк:байтяк QNT_  "" ;
валом:валом QNT_  "" ;
ве:ве QNT-ADN  "yksi" ;
ведьгеменнест:ведьгеменне Assoc-Coll  "" ;
веенст:веенст QNT_  "" ;
веень% кирда:веень% кирда QNT_  "" ;
вейке-вейке:вейке-вейке QNT-DISTR  "" ;
вейке-вейке:вейте-вейте QNT-DISTR  "" ;
вейкень-вейкень:вейкень-вейкень QNT-DISTR  "" ;
вейксэнест:вейксэне Assoc-Coll  "" ;
вейте:вейте QNT_  "" ;
весеме:весеме QNT_ВЕСЕМЕ  "" ;
весемезэ:весемезэ QNT_  "" ;
весенде:весенде QNT_  "" ;
вестешка:вестешка QNT_  "" ;
вестешкаксть:вестешкаксть QNT_  "" ;
вейке:вейке Cards-1-2  "" ;
ветенест:ветене Assoc-Coll  "" ;
пель:пель QNT_  "puoli, puolikas" ;
доволь:доволь QNT_  "" ;
кавозонк:кавозонк QNT_  "" ;
кавозонок:кавозонок QNT_  "" ;
кавозост:кавозост QNT_  "" ;
кавонест:кавоне AssocColl-kavone  "" ;
кавтозонк:кавтозонк QNT_  "" ;
кавтозонок:кавтозонок QNT_  "" ;
кавтозост:кавтозост QNT_  "" ;
кавтонь-кавтонь:кавтонь-кавтонь QNT-DISTR  "" ;
кавтоньгирда:кавтоньгирда QNT_  "" ;
кавтоньгирда:кавоньгирда QNT_  "" ;
кирда:кирда QNT_  "" ;
колмонст:колмонст QNT_  "" ;
ламо:ламо QNT_ЛАМО  "" ;
ламоньгирда:ламоньгирда QNT_  "" ;
омбо:омбо QNT_  "" ;
омбонст:омбонст QNT_  "" ;
омбоньгирда:омбоньгирда QNT_  "" ;
сатышка:сатышка QNT_  "" ;
тёжа:тёжа QNT_КУДО  "" ;
цютькеть:цютькеть QNT_  "" ;
цяк:цяк QNT_  "" ;
чуросто:чуросто ITER_  "" ;
эль:эль QNT_  "" ;
васняяк:васняяк ADV-ORD  "" ;
кавтоце:кавтоце ORD_  "" ;
весть:весть ITER_  "" ;
весть-кавксть:весть-кавксть ITER_  "" ;
ветексть:ветексть ITER_  "" ;
ветешкаксть:ветешкаксть ITER_  "" ;
зняроксть:зняроксть ITER_  "" ;
кавтошкаксть:кавтошкаксть ITER_  "" ;
кеветеексть:кеветеексть ITER_  "" ;
кеменьксть:кеменьксть ITER_  "" ;
колмоксть:колмоксть ITER_  "" ;
ламоксть:ламоксть ITER_  "" ;
нилексть:нилексть ITER_  "" ;
нилешкаксть:нилешкаксть ITER_  "" ;
нинге:нинге ITER_  "" ;
одов:одов ITER_  "" ;
одс:одс ITER_  "" ;
оштё:оштё ITER_  "" ;
сеедьстэ:сеедьстэ ITER_  "" ;
сеедьстэ:сеетьстэ ITER__SUB  "" ;
сисемексть:сисемексть ITER_  "" ;
сисемексть:сисемксть ITER_  "" ;
сядоксть:сядоксть ITER_  "" ;
таго:таго ITER_  "" ;
знярыя:знярыя QNT-INDEF  "" ;
зярыя:зярыя QNT-INDEF  "" ;
зярыяксть:зярыяксть ITER-INDEF  "" ;
а% весть:а% весть ITER_  "" ;
аламоксть:аламоксть ITER_  "" ;
кавксть:кавксть ITER_  "" ;
